North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 1. In General.

§ 163-278.5.
Scope of Article; severability.

The provisions of this Article apply to primaries and elections for North Carolina offices and to North Carolina referenda and do not apply to primaries and elections for federal offices or offices in other States or to non-North Carolina referenda. Any
provision in this Article that regulates a non-North Carolina entity does so only to the extent that the entity’s actions affect elections for North Carolina offices or North Carolina referenda.

The provisions of this Article are severable. If any provision is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions of the Article that can be given effect without the invalid provision.

This section applies to Articles and [Article] 22M of the General Statutes to the same extent that it applies to this Article.

History.
1999-31, s. 6(a); 2000-140, s. 82; 2005-430, s. 7; 2007-349, s. 5; 2009-534, s. 6; 2013-360, s. 21.1(d); 2013-381, ss. 38.1(g), 48.2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.6.
Definitions.

When used in this Article:

The term “affiliated party committee” means a General Assembly affiliated party committee as established by

G.S. 163-278.8

B or Council of State affiliated party committee as established by

G.S. 163-278.8

C. (3) The term “board” means the State Board of Elections with respect to all candidates for State, legislative, and judicial offices and the county board of elections with respect to all candidates for county and
municipal offices. The term means the State Board of Elections with respect to all statewide referenda and the county board of elections conducting all local referenda.

(5) The term “broadcasting station” means any commercial radio or television station or community antenna radio or television station. Special definitions of “radio” and “television” that apply only in Part 1A of this Article are set forth in

G.S. 163-278.38

Z.

(7) The term “business entity” means any partnership, joint venture, joint-stock company, company, firm, or any commercial or industrial establishment or enterprise.

(8j) The term “electioneering communication” means any broadcast, cable, or satellite communication, or mass mailing, or telephone bank that has all the following characteristics:

Refers to a clearly identified candidate for elected office.

In the case of the general election in November of the even-numbered year is aired or transmitted within 30 days of the election for that office.

May be received by either:

50,000 or more individuals in the State in an election for statewide office or 7,500 or more individuals in any other election if in the form of broadcast, cable, or satellite communication.

20,000 or more households, cumulative per election, in a statewide election or 2,500 households, cumulative per election, in any other election if in the form of mass mailing or telephone bank.

(9) The term “candidate” means any individual who, with respect to a public office listed in G.S. 163-278.6(18), has taken positive action for the purpose of bringing about that individual’s nomination, retention, or election to public office. Examples
of positive action include any of the following:

a. Filing a notice of candidacy, filing a notice to be retained, or a petition requesting to be a candidate.

b. Being certified as a nominee of a political party for a vacancy.

c. Otherwise qualifying as a candidate in a manner authorized by law.

Making a public announcement of a definite intent to run for public office in a particular election.

Receiving funds or making payments or giving the consent for anyone else to receive funds or transfer anything of value for the purpose of bringing about that individual’s nomination or election to office. Transferring anything of value includes incurring
an obligation to transfer anything of value.

Status as a candidate for the purpose of this Article continues if the individual is receiving contributions to repay loans or cover a deficit or is making expenditures to satisfy obligations from an election already held. Special definitions of “candidate”
and “candidate campaign committee” that apply only in Part 2 of this Article are set forth in

G.S. 163-278.38

Z.

(11) The term “communications media” or “media” means broadcasting stations, carrier current stations, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, outdoor advertising facilities, billboards, newspaper inserts, and any person or individual whose business is polling
public opinion, analyzing or predicting voter behavior or voter preferences. Special definitions of “print media,” “radio,” and “television” that apply only in Part 1A of this Article are set forth in G.S. 163-278.38Z.

(13) The terms “contribute” or “contribution” mean any advance, conveyance, deposit, distribution, transfer of funds, loan, payment, gift, pledge or subscription of money or anything of value whatsoever, made to, or in coordination with, a candidate to
support or oppose the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates, to a political committee, to a political party, to an affiliated party committee, or to a referendum committee, whether or not
made in an election year, and any contract, agreement, or other obligation to make a contribution. An expenditure forgiven by a person or entity to whom it is owed shall be reported as a contribution from that person
or entity. These terms include, without limitation, such contributions as labor or personal services, postage, publication of campaign literature or materials, in-kind transfers, loans or use of any supplies, office
machinery, vehicles, aircraft, office space, or similar or related services, goods, or personal or real property. These terms also include, without limitation, the proceeds of sale of services, campaign literature and
materials, wearing apparel, tickets or admission prices to campaign events such as rallies or dinners, and the proceeds of sale of any campaign-related services or goods. Notwithstanding the foregoing meanings of “contribution,”
the word shall not be construed to include services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee. The
term “contribution” does not include an “independent expenditure.” If:

a. Any individual, person, committee, association, or any other organization or group of individuals, including but not limited to, a political organization (as defined in section 527(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986) makes, or contracts to
make, any disbursement for any electioneering communication, as defined in this section; and

b. That disbursement is coordinated with a candidate, an authorized political committee of that candidate, a State or local political party or committee of that party, an affiliated party committee, or an agent or official of any such candidate, party,
or committee

that disbursement or contracting shall be treated as a contribution to the candidate supported by the electioneering communication or that candidate’s party and as an expenditure by that candidate or that candidate’s party.

(14) — (19) [Reserved.]

(20) The term “coordinated expenditure” means an expenditure that is made in concert or cooperation with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a candidate campaign committee as defined in G.S. 163-278.3(3), the agent of the candidate, or the
agent of the candidate campaign committee. An expenditure for the distribution of information relating to a candidate’s campaign, positions, or policies, that is obtained through publicly available resources, including
a candidate campaign committee, is not a coordinated expenditure if it is not made in concert or cooperation with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, the candidate campaign committee, the agent of the
candidate, or the agent of the candidate campaign committee.

(22) The term “coordination” means in concert or cooperation with, or at the request or suggestion of.

(24) The term “corporation” means any corporation established under either domestic or foreign charter, and includes a corporate subsidiary and any business entity in which a corporation participates or is a stockholder, a partner or a joint venturer.
The term applies regardless of whether the corporation does business in the State of North Carolina.

(26) The term “costs of collection” means monies spent by the State Board in the collection of the penalties levied under this Article to the extent the costs do not constitute more than fifty percent (50%) of the civil penalty. The costs are presumed
to be ten percent (10%) of the civil penalty unless otherwise determined by the State Board of Elections based on the records of expenses incurred by the State Board of Elections for its collection procedures.

(28) The term “day” means calendar day.

(30) The term “election” means any general or special election, a first or second primary, a run-off election, or an election to fill a vacancy. The term “election” shall not include any local or statewide referendum.

(32) The term “election cycle” means the period of time from January 1 after an election for an office through December 31 after the election for the next term of the same office. Where the term is applied in the context of several offices with different
terms, “election cycle” means the period from January 1 of an odd-numbered year through December 31 of the next even-numbered year.

(33) — (40) [Reserved.]

(41) The term “electioneering communication” means any broadcast, cable, or satellite communication, or mass mailing, or telephone bank that has all the following characteristics:

a. Refers to a clearly identified candidate for elected office.

b. In the case of the general election in November of the even-numbered year is aired or transmitted within 60 days of the election for that office.

c. May be received by either:

50,000 or more individuals in the State in an election for statewide office or 7,500 or more individuals in any other election if in the form of broadcast, cable, or satellite communication.

20,000 or more households, cumulative per election, in a statewide election or 2,500 households, cumulative per election, in any other election if in the form of mass mailing or telephone bank.

(43) The term “electioneering communication” does not include any of the following:

a. A communication appearing in a news story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the facilities of any broadcasting station, unless those facilities are owned or controlled by any political party, affiliated party committee, political committee,
or candidate.

b. A communication that constitutes an expenditure or independent expenditure under this Article.

c. A communication that constitutes a candidate debate or forum conducted pursuant to rules adopted by the Board or that solely promotes that debate or forum and is made by or on behalf of the person sponsoring the debate or forum.

d. A communication made while the General Assembly is in session which, incidental to advocacy for or against a specific piece of legislation pending before the General Assembly, urges the audience to communicate with a member or members of the General
Assembly concerning that piece of legislation or a solicitation of others as defined in

G.S. 163-120

C-100(a)(13) properly reported under Chapter 120C of the General Statute.

e. A communication that meets all of the following criteria:

1. Does not mention any election, candidacy, political party, opposing candidate, or voting by the general public.

2. Does not take a position on the candidate’s character or qualifications and fitness for office.

Proposes a commercial transaction.

A public opinion poll conducted by a news medium, as defined in G.S. 8-53.11(a)(3), conducted by an organization whose primary purpose is to conduct or publish public opinion polls, or contracted for by a person to be conducted by an organization whose
primary purpose is to conduct or publish public opinion polls. This sub-subdivision shall not apply to a push poll. For the purpose of this sub-subdivision, “push poll” shall mean the political campaign technique in which
an individual or organization attempts to influence or alter the view of respondents under the guise of conducting a public opinion poll.

A communication made by a news medium, as defined in G.S. 8-53.11(a)(3), if the communication is in print.

(45) — (48) [Reserved.]

(49) The term “enforcement costs” means salaries, overhead, and other monies spent by the State Board of Elections in the enforcement of the penalties provisions of this Article, including the costs of investigators, attorneys, travel costs for State
Board employees and its attorneys, to the extent the costs do not constitute more than fifty percent (50%) of the sum levied for the enforcement costs and civil late penalty.

(51) The terms “expend” or “expenditure” mean any purchase, advance, conveyance, deposit, distribution, transfer of funds, loan, payment, gift, pledge or subscription of money or anything of value whatsoever, whether or not made in an election year, and
any contract, agreement, or other obligation to make an expenditure, to support or oppose the nomination, election, or passage of one or more clearly identified candidates, or ballot measure. An expenditure forgiven
by a person or entity to whom it is owed shall be reported as a contribution from that person or entity. Supporting or opposing the election of clearly identified candidates includes supporting or opposing the candidates
of a clearly identified political party. The term “expenditure” also includes any payment or other transfer made by a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee.

(53) The term “independently expend” or “independent expenditure” means an expenditure to support or oppose the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates that is not a coordinated expenditure. Supporting or opposing the election
of clearly identified candidates includes supporting or opposing the candidates of a clearly identified political party. A contribution is not an independent expenditure. As applied to referenda, the term “independent
expenditure” applies if consultation or coordination does not take place with a referendum committee that supports a ballot measure the expenditure supports, or a referendum committee that opposes the ballot measure
the expenditure opposes.

(55) The term “individual” means a single individual or more than one individual.

(57) The term “insurance company” means any person whose business is making or underwriting contracts of insurance, and includes mutual insurance companies, stock insurance companies, and fraternal beneficiary associations.

(59) The term “labor union” means any union, organization, combination or association of employees or workmen formed for the purposes of securing by united action favorable wages, improved labor conditions, better hours of labor or work-related benefits,
or for handling, processing or righting grievances by employees against their employers, or for representing employees collectively or individually in dealings with their employers. The term includes any unions to which
Article 10, Chapter 95 applies.

(60) — (69) [Reserved.]

(70) The term “mass mailing” means any mailing by United States mail or facsimile to 20,000 or more households, cumulative per election, in a statewide election or 2,500 households, cumulative per election, in any other election.

(72) The term “person” means any business entity, corporation, insurance company, labor union, or professional association.

(74) The term “political committee” means a combination of two or more individuals, such as any person, committee, association, organization, or other entity that makes, or accepts anything of value to make, contributions or expenditures and has one or
more of the following characteristics:

a. Is controlled by a candidate;

b. Is a political party or executive committee of a political party or is controlled by a political party or executive committee of a political party;

c. Is created by a corporation, business entity, insurance company, labor union, or professional association pursuant to G.S. 163-278.19(b); or

d. Has the major purpose to support or oppose the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates; [or]

e.
Is an affiliated party committee.Supporting or opposing the election of clearly identified candidates includes supporting or opposing the candidates of a clearly identified political party.If the entity
qualifies as a “political committee” under sub-subdivision a., b., c., or d. of this subdivision, it continues to be a political committee if it receives contributions or makes expenditures or maintains assets or liabilities.
A political committee ceases to exist when it winds up its operations, disposes of its assets, and files its final report.The term “political committee” includes the campaign of a candidate who serves as his or her
own treasurer.Special definitions of “political action committee” and “candidate campaign committee” that apply only in Part 2 of this Article are set forth in G.S. 163-278.38Z.

(76)
The term “political party” means any political party organized or operating in this State, whether or not that party is recognized under the provisions of

G.S. 163-96

. A special definition of “political party organization” that applies only in Part 1A of this Article is set forth in G.S. 163-278.38Z. An affiliated party committee is deemed a political party for
this Article as set forth in G.S. 163-278.8B and G.S. 163-278.8C.

(78)
The term “professional association” means any trade association, group, organization, association, or collection of persons or individuals formed for the purposes of advancing, representing, improving,
furthering or preserving the interests of persons or individuals having a common vocation, profession, calling, occupation, employment, or training.

(80)
The term “public office” means any office filled by election by the people on a statewide, county, municipal or district basis, and this Article shall be applicable to such elective offices whether the
election therefor is partisan or nonpartisan.

(82)
The term “referendum” means any question, issue, or act referred to a vote of the people of the entire State by the General Assembly, a unit of local government, or by the people under any applicable
local act and includes constitutional amendments and State bond issues. The term “referendum” includes any type of municipal, county, or special district referendum and any initiative or referendum authorized by a municipal
charter or local act. A recall election shall not be considered a referendum within the meaning of this Article.

(84)
The term “referendum committee” means a combination of two or more individuals such as a committee, association, organization, or other entity or a combination of two or more business entities, corporations,
insurance companies, labor unions, or professional associations such as a committee, association, organization, or other entity the primary purpose of which is to support or oppose the passage of any referendum on the
ballot. If the entity qualifies as a “referendum committee” under this subdivision, it continues to be a referendum committee if it receives contributions or makes expenditures or maintains assets or liabilities. A
referendum committee ceases to exist when it winds up its operations, disposes of its assets, and files its final report.

(85)
— (92) [Reserved.]

(93)
The term “telephone bank” means telephone calls that are targeted to the relevant electorate, except when those telephone calls are made by volunteer workers, whether or not the design of the telephone
bank system, development of calling instructions, or training of volunteers was done by paid professionals.

(95)
The term “treasurer” means an individual appointed by a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee as provided in

G.S. 163-278.7

or

G.S. 163-278.40

A.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 798, ss. 5, 6; 1979, c. 500, s. 1; c. 1073, ss. 1-3, 19, 20; 1981, c. 837, s. 1; 1983, c. 331, s. 6; 1985, c. 352, ss. 1-3; 1997-515, ss. 4(a)-(c), 7(b)-(d); 1999-31, ss. 1(a), (b), 2(a)-(c),
3, 4(a); 1999-424, s. 6(a), (b); 2002-159, s. 55(n); 2003-278, s. 5; 2004-125, s. 3; 2004-127, s. 15; 2004-203, s. 12(b); 2005-430, s. 10; 2006-264, s. 23; 2007-391, s. 3; 2008-150, s. 6(a); 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-534, ss. 1, 3(a),
(b); 2010-170, s. 1; 2011-31, s. 20; 2013-381, s. 50.1; 2015-66, s. 8(a); 2015-258, s. 3(b), (b1); 2015-264, s. 81(c), (d); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(m); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.6.

Local Modification.

Town of Chapel Hill: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1023, s. 2, 2007-222, s. 1 (expires July 1, 2012).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-170, s. 17, provides, in part: “Sections 1 through 15 of this act become effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§ 163-278.7.
Appointment of political treasurers.

Each candidate who has received funds or made payments or given consent for anyone else to receive funds or transfer anything of value for the purpose of bringing about that individual’s nomination or election for office, political committee, and referendum
committee shall appoint a treasurer and, under verification, report the name and address of the treasurer to the Board. Only an individual who resides in North Carolina shall be appointed as a treasurer. A candidate may appoint
himself or herself or any other individual, including any relative except his or her spouse, as the candidate’s treasurer, and, upon failure to file [a] report designating a treasurer, the candidate shall be concluded to have appointed
himself or herself as treasurer and shall be required to personally fulfill the duties and responsibilities imposed upon the appointed treasurer and subject to the penalties and sanctions hereinafter provided.

Each appointed treasurer shall file with the Board at the time required by G.S. 163-278(a)(1) a statement of organization that includes:

The Name, Address and Purpose of the Candidate, Political Committee, or Referendum Committee. — When the political committee or referendum committee is created pursuant to G.S. 163-278.19(b), the name shall be or include the name of the corporation, insurance
company, business entity, labor union or professional association whose officials, employees, or members established the committee. When the political committee or referendum committee is not created pursuant to G.S. 163-278.19(b),
the name shall be or include the economic interest, if identifiable, principally represented by the committee’s organizers or intended to be advanced by use of the committee’s receipts;

The names, addresses, and relationships of affiliated or connected candidates, political committees, referendum committees, political parties, affiliated party committees, or similar organizations;

The territorial area, scope, or jurisdiction of the candidate, political committee, or referendum committee;

The name, address, and position with the candidate or political committee of the custodian of books and accounts;

The name and party affiliation of the candidate(s) whom the committee is supporting or opposing, and the office(s) involved;

The name of the referendum(s) which the referendum committee is supporting or opposing, and whether the committee is supporting or opposing the referendum;

The name of the political committee, political party or affiliated party committee being supported or opposed if the committee is supporting the ticket of a particular candidate or political party;

A listing of all banks, safety deposit boxes, or other depositories used, including the names and numbers of all accounts maintained and the numbers of all such safety deposit boxes used, provided that the Board shall keep any account number included
in any report filed after March 1, 2003, and required by this Article confidential except as necessary to conduct an audit or investigation, except as required by a court of competent jurisdiction, or unless confidentiality
is waived by the treasurer. Disclosure of an account number in violation of this subdivision shall not give rise to a civil cause of action. This limitation of liability does not apply to the disclosure of account numbers
in violation of this subdivision as a result of gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing that would otherwise be actionable;

The name or names and address or addresses of any assistant treasurers appointed by the treasurer. Such assistant treasurers shall be authorized to act in the name of the candidate, political committee, or referendum committee and shall be fully responsible
for any act or acts committed by the assistant treasurer. The treasurer shall be fully liable for any violation of this Article committed by any assistant treasurer; and

Any other information which might be requested by the Board that deals with the campaign organization of the candidate or referendum committee.

Any change in information previously submitted in a statement of organization shall be reported to the Board within a 10-day period following the change.

A candidate, political committee or referendum committee may remove his or its treasurer. In case of the death, resignation or removal of his or its treasurer before compliance with all obligations of a treasurer under this Article, such candidate, political
committee or referendum committee shall appoint a successor within 10 days of the vacancy of such office, and certify the name and address of the successor in the manner provided in the case of an original appointment.

Every treasurer of a referendum committee shall receive, prior to every election in which the referendum committee is involved, training from the State Board of Elections as to the duties of the office, including the requirements of G.S. 163-278.13(i),
provided that the treasurer may designate an employee or volunteer of the committee to receive the training.

Every treasurer of a political committee shall participate in training as to the duties of the office within three months of appointment and at least once every four years thereafter. The State Board of Elections shall provide the training as to the duties
of the office in person, through regional seminars, and through interactive electronic means. The treasurer may designate an assistant treasurer to participate in the training, if one is named under subdivision (b)(9) of this section.
The treasurer may choose to participate in training prior to each election in which the political committee is involved. All such training shall be free of charge to the treasurer and assistant treasurer.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 500, s. 2; c. 1073, ss. 4, 5, 16, 18, 20; 1987, c. 113, s. 1; 1995, c. 315, s. 1; 2002-159, s. 57.1(a); 2004-203, s. 59(a); 2005-430, s. 10.1; 2006-195, s. 7; 2009-534, s. 4; 2015-258, s. 3(c);
2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.10; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.7A.
Gifts from federal political committees.

It shall be permissible for a federal political committee, as defined by the Federal Election Campaign Act and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, to make contributions to a North Carolina candidate or political committee registered under this Article
with the State Board of Elections or a county board of elections, provided that the contributing committee does all the following:

Is registered with the State Board of Elections consistent with the provisions of this Article.

Complies with reporting requirements specified by the State Board of Elections. Those requirements shall not be more stringent than those required of North Carolina political committees registered under this Article, unless the federal political committee
makes any contribution to a North Carolina candidate or political committee in any election in excess of four thousand dollars ($4,000) for that election. “Election” shall be as defined in G.S. 163-278.13(d).

Makes its contributions within the limits specified in this Article.

Appoints an assistant or deputy treasurer who is a resident of North Carolina and stipulates to the State Board of Elections that the designated in-State resident assistant or deputy treasurer shall be authorized to produce whatever records reflecting
political activity in North Carolina the State Board of Elections deems necessary.

History.
1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 593, s. 1; 2003-274, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.8.
Detailed accounts to be kept by political treasurers.

The treasurer of each candidate, political committee, and referendum committee shall keep detailed accounts, current within not more than seven days after the date of receiving a contribution or making an expenditure, of all contributions received and
all expenditures made by or on behalf of the candidate, political committee, or referendum committee. The accounts shall include the information required by the State Board of Elections on its forms.

Accounts kept by the treasurer of a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee or the accounts of a treasurer or political committee at any bank or other depository listed under G.S. 163-278.7(b)(7), may be inspected, before or after the
election to which the accounts refer, by a member, designee, agent, attorney or employee of the Board who is making an investigation pursuant to

G.S. 163-278.22

.

All expenditures for media expenses shall be made by a verifiable form of payment. The State Board of Elections shall prescribe methods to ensure an audit trail for every expenditure so that the identity of each payee can be determined. All media expenditures
in any amount shall be accounted for and reported individually and separately with specific descriptions to provide a reasonable understanding of the expenditure.

All expenditures for nonmedia expenses (except postage) of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be made by a verifiable form of payment. The State Board of Elections shall prescribe methods to ensure an audit trail for every expenditure so that the
identity of each payee can be determined. All expenditures for nonmedia expenses of fifty dollars ($50.00) or less may be made by check or by cash payment. All nonmedia expenditures of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be
accounted for and reported individually and separately with a specific description to provide a reasonable understanding of the expenditure, but expenditures of fifty dollars ($50.00) or less may be accounted for and reported in
an aggregated amount, but in that case the treasurer shall account for and report that the treasurer made expenditures of fifty dollars ($50.00) or less each, the amounts, dates, and the purposes for which made. In the case of
a nonmedia expenditure required to be accounted for individually and separately with a specific description to provide a reasonable understanding of the expenditure by this subsection, if the expenditure was to an individual, the
report shall list the name and address of the individual.

All proceeds from loans shall be recorded separately with a detailed analysis reflecting the amount of the loan, the source, the period, the rate of interest, and the security pledged, if any, and all makers and endorsers.

The treasurer shall maintain all moneys of the political committee in a bank account or bank accounts used exclusively by the political committee and shall not commingle those funds with any other moneys.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1977, c. 635, s. 1; 1979, c. 1073, ss. 16, 20; 1981, c. 814, s. 1; 1985, c. 353, ss. 1, 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 744, s. 1; 1999-424, s. 7(m); 2004-125, s. 5(a); 2005-430, ss. 2, 3; 2006-161, ss.
2, 3; 2006-195, s. 4; 2008-150, s. 10(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.8A.
Campaign sales by political party executive committees.

Exempt Purchase Price Not Treated as “Contribution.” — Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 163-278.6(13), the purchase price of goods or services sold by a political party executive committee or affiliated party committee as provided in subsection
(b) of this section shall not be treated as a “contribution” for purposes of account-keeping under

G.S. 163-278.8

, for purposes of the reporting of contributions under

G.S. 163-278.11

, or for the purpose of the limit on contributions under

G.S. 163-278.13

. The treasurer is not required to obtain, maintain, or report the name or other identifying information of the purchaser of the goods or services, as long as the requirements of subsection (b) of this section are
satisfied. However, the proceeds from the sales of those goods and services shall be treated as contributions for other purposes, and expenditures of those proceeds shall be reported as expenditures under this Article.

Exempt Purchase Price. — A purchase price for goods or services sold by a political party executive committee or affiliated party committee qualifies for the exemption provided in subsection (a) of this section as long as the sale of the goods or services
adheres to a plan that the treasurer has submitted to and that has been approved in writing by the Executive Director of the State Board of Elections. The Executive Director shall approve the treasurer’s plan upon and only upon
finding that all the following requirements are satisfied:

That the price to be charged for the goods or services is reasonably close to the market price for the goods or services.

That the total amount to be raised from sales under all plans by the committee does not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per election cycle.

That no purchaser makes total purchases under the plan that exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

That the treasurer include in the report under

G.S. 163-278.11

, covering the relevant time period, all of the following:

A description of the plan.

The amount raised from sales under the plan.

The number of purchases made.

That the treasurer shall include in the appropriate report under

G.S. 163-278.11

any in-kind contribution made to the political party in providing the goods or services sold under the plan and that no in-kind contribution accepted as part of the plan violates any provision of this Article.The
Executive Director may require a format for submission of a plan, but that format shall not place undue paperwork burdens upon the treasurer. As used in this subdivision, the term “election cycle” has the same meaning as
in G.S. 163-278.6(32).

History.
2008-150, s. 8(a); 2015-258, s. 3(d); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2020-84, s. 1(a).

§ 163-278.8B.
Affiliated party committees.

Each political party caucus of the North Carolina House of Representatives and the North Carolina Senate may establish one separate affiliated party committee to support the election of candidates who would be eligible to be members of that caucus. No
other affiliated party committees shall be authorized pursuant to this section. The affiliated party committee is deemed a political party for purposes of this Article.

An affiliated party committee shall be established only by majority vote of the total membership of the political party caucus. Attached to the organizational report filed in accordance with

G.S. 163-9

, the affiliated party committee shall provide a report to the State Board of Elections certifying that the political party caucus has organized and taken the appropriate vote to establish an affiliated party committee.
The report described in this subsection shall be a public record within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Each affiliated party committee shall:

Adopt bylaws which shall be in compliance with the provisions of this Article. At a minimum, the bylaws shall include designation of a treasurer.

Conduct campaigns for candidates who would be eligible to be members of that political party caucus of the North Carolina House of Representatives or North Carolina Senate if elected or reelected or manage daily operations of the affiliated party committee.

Establish a bank account.

Accept contributions and expend funds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an affiliated party committee shall be entitled to use the name, abbreviation, and symbol of its respective political party.

For purposes of this section, “political party” has the same meaning as defined in

G.S. 163-96

.

History.
2015-258, s. 3(a); 2015-264, s. 81(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.8C.
Council of State affiliated party committees.

Members of the Council of State affiliated with the same political party may establish one separate Council of State affiliated party committee to support the election of candidates who would be eligible to be nominees of that political party for Council
of State offices. No other Council of State affiliated party committees shall be authorized pursuant to this section. The Council of State affiliated party committee is deemed a political party for purposes of this Article.

Each Council of State affiliated party committee shall:

Adopt bylaws which shall be in compliance with the provisions of this Article. At a minimum, the bylaws shall include designation of a treasurer.

Conduct campaigns for candidates for Council of State who are members of the leader’s political party or manage daily operations of the Council of State affiliated party committee.

Establish a bank account.

Accept contributions and expend funds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a Council of State affiliated party committee shall be entitled to use the name, abbreviation, and symbol of the political party of its leader.

A previously established Council of State affiliated party committee may continue to be maintained in the event that no individual affiliated with that political party is elected to serve on the Council of State in the general election. The Council of
State affiliated party committee shall be maintained by the most recently elected members of the Council of State from that political party. Notwithstanding the definition of “leader” in subsection (e) of this section, those members
shall designate an individual from that group to serve as leader. When an individual or individuals affiliated with that political party is next elected to the Council of State, that individual or individuals shall assume control
of the Council of State affiliated party committee for that political party.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

Leader. — The highest-ranking individual affiliated with the political party of the Council of State affiliated party committee. For the purposes of this subdivision, the highest-ranking office serving on the Council of State shall be in the following
order: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and the offices as set out in Article III, Section 7 of the North Carolina Constitution, as follows: Secretary of State, State Auditor, State Treasurer, Superintendent of Public Instruction,
Attorney General, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, and Commissioner of Insurance.

Political party. — As defined in

G.S. 163-96

.

History.
2015-258, s. 3(a1); 2015-264, s. 81(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).